Ohio, session 136, SB196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 1345.53 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 1345.53. (A) As used in this section : 6
(1) "Entertainment" means all forms of entertainment, 7
including theatrical or operatic performances, dance, ballet, 8
concerts, motion pictures, entertainment at fairgrounds, 9
amusement parks, athletic competitions and other sports, and all 10
other forms of diversion, recreation, or show. 11
(2)(a) "Fee" means a service charge, surcharge, processing 12
fee, or any other amount charged or collected by an operator or 13
online ticket marketplace in excess of the operator's base 14
ticket price or, in the case of tickets sold on behalf of a 15
ticket reseller, the resale price. 16
(b) "Fee" does not include a tax or fee imposed by the 17
state or a political subdivision, as defined in section 2744.01 18
of the Revised Code, including a municipal admissions tax 19

S. B. No. 196 Page 2
As Introduced
described in division (C)(1) of section 715.013 of the Revised 20
Code, a township admission fee under section 503.54 of the 21
Revised Code, a ticket charge or surcharge authorized by section 22
307.695 of the Revised Code, or a tax under section 3773.54 of 23
the Revised Code. 24
(c) "Fee" does not include amounts charged for insurance 25
products such as those that reimburse the purchaser if the 26
entertainment event is canceled or postponed. 27
(3) "Online ticket marketplace" means the administrator of 28
a web site or other electronic service, including an agent, 29
employee, or assignee of the administrator, that sells tickets 30
or maintains a platform to facilitate the sale of tickets. 31
(4) "Operator" means a person, including an agent, 32
employee, or assignee of the person who does one or more of the 33
following: 34
(a) Owns, operates, or controls a place of entertainment; 35
(b) Produces entertainment; 36
(c) Sells a ticket to a place of entertainment for 37
original sale. 38
(5) "Place of entertainment" means an entertainment 39
facility, including an amphitheater, theater, stadium, arena, 40
racetrack, museum, amusement park, venue, club, or other place 41
where performances, concerts, exhibits, athletic games, 42
contests, or other forms of entertainment are held. 43
(6) "Ticket reseller" means a person that offers or sells 44
tickets to an entertainment event held at a place of 45
entertainment in this state for resale after the original sale 46
of such tickets. 47

S. B. No. 196 Page 3
As Introduced
(B) No online ticket marketplace or operator shall charge 48
or collect more than five dollars in total fees in any 49
transaction in which one or more tickets to an entertainment 50
event held at a place of entertainment in this state are sold to 51
a consumer. 52
(C) Any violation of division (B) of this section is an 53
unfair and deceptive act or practice in violation of section 54
1345.02 of the Revised Code. All powers and remedies available 55
to the attorney general to enforce sections 1345.01 to 1345.13 56
of the Revised Code are available to the attorney general to 57
enforce this section. 58